Illinois, session 104th, HB5008.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 11-204 and 11-506 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-204)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-204)7    Sec. 11-204. Fleeing or attempting to elude a peace 8officer. 9    (a) Any driver or operator of a motor vehicle who, having 10been given a visual or audible signal by a peace officer 11directing such driver or operator to bring his vehicle to a 12stop, wilfully fails or refuses to obey such direction, 13increases his speed, extinguishes his lights, or otherwise 14flees or attempts to elude the officer, is guilty of a Class 4 15felony A misdemeanor. The signal given by the peace officer 16may be by hand, voice, siren, red or blue light. Provided, the 17officer giving such signal shall be in police uniform, and, if 18driving a vehicle, such vehicle shall display illuminated 19oscillating, rotating or flashing red or blue lights which 20when used in conjunction with an audible horn or siren would 21indicate the vehicle to be an official police vehicle. Such 22requirement shall not preclude the use of amber or white 23oscillating, rotating or flashing lights in conjunction with   HB5008- 2 -LRB104 17123 LNS 30542 b1red or blue oscillating, rotating or flashing lights as 2required in Section 12-215 of Chapter 12.3    (b) Upon receiving notice of such conviction the Secretary 4of State shall suspend the drivers license of the person so 5convicted for a period of not more than 6 months for a first 6conviction and not more than 12 months for a second 7conviction.8    (c) A third or subsequent violation of this Section is a 9Class 3 4 felony.10(Source: P.A. 93-120, eff. 1-1-04.) 11    (625 ILCS 5/11-506)12    Sec. 11-506. Street racing; aggravated street racing; 13street sideshows.14    (a) No person shall engage in street racing on any street 15or highway of this State.16    (a-5) No person shall engage in a street sideshow on any 17street or highway of this State. 18    (b) No owner of any vehicle shall acquiesce in or permit 19his or her vehicle to be used by another for the purpose of 20street racing or a street sideshow.21    (b-5) A person may not knowingly interfere with or cause 22the movement of traffic to slow or stop for the purpose of 23facilitating street racing or a street sideshow. 24    (c) For the purposes of this Section:25    "Acquiesce" or "permit" means actual knowledge that the   HB5008- 3 -LRB104 17123 LNS 30542 b1motor vehicle was to be used for the purpose of street racing 2or a street sideshow.3    "Motor vehicle stunt" includes, but is not limited to, 4operating a vehicle in a manner that causes the vehicle to 5slide or spin, driving within the proximity of a gathering of 6persons, performing maneuvers to demonstrate the performance 7capability of the motor vehicle, or maneuvering the vehicle in 8an attempt to elicit a reaction from a gathering of persons. 9    "Street racing" means:10        (1) The operation of 2 or more vehicles from a point 11    side by side at accelerating speeds in a competitive 12    attempt to outdistance each other; or13        (2) The operation of one or more vehicles over a 14    common selected course, each starting at the same point, 15    for the purpose of comparing the relative speeds or power 16    of acceleration of such vehicle or vehicles within a 17    certain distance or time limit; or18        (3) The use of one or more vehicles in an attempt to 19    outgain or outdistance another vehicle; or20        (4) The use of one or more vehicles to prevent another 21    vehicle from passing; or22        (5) The use of one or more vehicles to arrive at a 23    given destination ahead of another vehicle or vehicles; or24        (6) The use of one or more vehicles to test the 25    physical stamina or endurance of drivers over 26    long-distance driving routes.  HB5008- 4 -LRB104 17123 LNS 30542 b1    "Street sideshow" means an event in which one or more 2vehicles block or impede traffic on a street or highway, for 3the purpose of performing unauthorized motor vehicle stunts, 4motor vehicle speed contests, or motor vehicle exhibitions of 5speed. 6    (d) Penalties.7        (1) Any person who is convicted of a violation of 8    subsection (a), (a-5), or (b-5) shall be guilty of a Class 9    A misdemeanor for the first offense and shall be subject 10    to a minimum fine of $250. Any person convicted of a 11    violation of subsection (a), (a-5), or (b-5) a second or 12    subsequent time shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony and 13    shall be subject to a minimum fine of $500. The driver's 14    license of any person convicted of subsection (a) shall be 15    revoked in the manner provided by Section 6-205 of this 16    Code.17        (2) Any person who is convicted of a violation of 18    subsection (b) shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. 19    Any person who is convicted of subsection (b) for a second 20    or subsequent time shall be guilty of a Class A 21    misdemeanor.22        (3) Every person convicted of committing a violation 23    of subsection (a) of this Section shall be guilty of 24    aggravated street racing if the person, in committing a 25    violation of subsection (a) was involved in a motor 26    vehicle crash that resulted in great bodily harm or   HB5008- 5 -LRB104 17123 LNS 30542 b1    permanent disability or disfigurement to another, where 2    the violation was a proximate cause of the injury. 3    Aggravated street racing is a Class 4 felony for which the 4    defendant, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall 5    be sentenced to not less than one year nor more than 12 6    years. 7        (4) Any person who participates in street racing or a 8    street sideshow, including as a spectator, where 10 or 9    more people are present shall be guilty of a petty 10    offense. 11(Source: P.A. 102-733, eff. 1-1-23; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 12103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-706, eff. 1-1-25.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.